Ohio, session 136, HB293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.282 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5.282. The fourth Thursday of January is designated 6
as "NASA Day of Remembrance" to pay tribute to and honor members 7
of the national aeronautics and space administration family who 8
have lost their lives while furthering the cause of space 9
exploration and discovery for the benefit of all, including the 10
crews of Apollo 1 and space shuttles Challenger and Columbia. 11